Hawaii statutes.
§172-2 Department to appraise lands;
determine commutation; interest; lien. The department of land and natural
resources shall cause to be appraised each piece of property upon which
commutation shall then be due. The value of the property for the purposes of
this chapter shall be fixed by the appraisers as nearly as may be at the value
of the land without improvements as of the date of the award of the property
made by the board of commissioners to quiet land titles.

Upon the value so ascertained the department
shall determine the amount of the commutation due according to the terms of the
award. The commutation so fixed shall bear interest from and after
January 1, 1910, until paid, at the rate of six per cent a year and the
commutation and interest is hereby made a lien upon the land superior to all
other encumbrances. [L 1909, c 90, §2; RL 1925, §571; RL 1935, §1602; RL 1945,
§4632; RL 1955, §100-2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS
§172-2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next